Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 32
RACING

Editor's note:

This article 32 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 32, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 DIVISION OF RACING EVENTS

PART 3 COLORADO RACING COMMISSION

PART 4 CONFLICT OF INTEREST

PART 5 LICENSING AND REGISTRATION

PART 6 UNLAWFUL ACTS

PART 7 TAXES AND FEES

PART 8 ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES

PART 9 REVIEW AND TERMINATION PROVISIONS